District of Columbia statutes.
31-1102

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)

The term “insurance premium finance company” means a person engaged in the business of entering into insurance premium finance agreements.

(2)

The term “premium finance agreement” means an agreement by which an insured or prospective insured promises to pay to a premium finance company the amount advanced or to be advanced under the agreement to an insurer or to an insurance agent or broker in payment of premiums on an insurance contract together with a service charge as authorized and limited by this chapter.

(3)

The term “licensee” means a premium finance company holding a license issued by the Commissioner under this chapter.

Oct. 9, 1940, ch. 792, ch. III, § 52
Apr. 18, 1966, 80 Stat. 126, Pub. L. 89-403, § 1
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 29(d), 45 DCR 745
1981 Ed., § 35-1552.
1973 Ed., § 35-1362.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.